Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5025.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) The department of transportation shall post a human trafficking notice on the premises of each rest stop and welcome facility in this state in the manner described in this act and as required by the department under this act. (2) Each local unit of government that operates a rest stop or welcome facility shall post a human trafficking notice on the premises of that rest stop or welcome facility in the manner described in this act and as required by the department under this act. (3) Each local unit of government, or authority allowed by law, that provides bus or rail transportation services to the public shall post a human trafficking notice on the premises of any station that provides those services in the manner described in this act and as required by the department under this act. (4) Each of the following shall post a human trafficking notice on its premises in the manner described in this act and as required by the department under this act: (a) Any entity that owns property that has been found by a court to constitute a public nuisance due to acts of prostitution commercial sexual activity or human trafficking being conducted on the property or arising out of the ownership or use of the property. (b) An adult entertainment establishment. (c) Public airports.A public airport. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5016 (request no. H04060'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.